California, session 20252026, AB1320.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 127698 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:127698. (a) Notwithstanding Section 127692, a state agency shall not, pursuant to this chapter, award a contract on a noncompetitive basis for the purchase or acquisition of an opioid antagonist with a contractor that has entered into a multistate settlement agreement for its role in contributing to the opioid epidemic.(b) A contract is void and unenforceable if it violates this section.(c) This section shall apply retroactively to any contract entered into before January 1, 2026.(d) For purposes of this section, “opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that, when administered, negates or neutralizes in whole or in part the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body, and has been approved for the treatment of an opioid overdose.